Utah statutes.
63A-8-101 (Superseded 07/01/10).   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Accounts receivable" or "receivables" means any amount due the state
from an entity for which payment has not been received by the state agency
that is servicing the debt.
(b)  "Accounts receivable" includes unpaid fees, licenses, taxes, loans,
overpayments, fines, forfeitures, surcharges, costs, contracts, interest,
penalties, restitution to victims, third-party claims, sale of goods, sale of
services, claims, and damages.
(2)  "Administrative offset" means:
(a)  a reduction of an individual's tax refund or other payments due to the
individual to reduce or eliminate accounts receivable that the individual owes
to the state; and
(b)  a reduction of an entity's tax refund or other payments due to the entity
to reduce or eliminate accounts receivable that the entity owes to the state.
(3)  "Entity" means an individual, a corporation, partnership, or other
organization that pays taxes to or does business with the state.
(4)  "Office" means the Office of State Debt Collection established by this
chapter.
(5)  "Past due" means any accounts receivable that the state has not received
by the payment due date.
(6) (a)  "State agency" includes any department, division, commission,
council, board, bureau, committee, office, or other administrative subunit of
Utah state government, including the legislative and judicial branches of
state government.
(b)  "State agency" does not include:
(i)  any institution of higher education; or
(ii)  except in Subsection 63A-8-201(7)(g), the State Tax Commission.
(7)  "Writing-off" means the removal of an accounts receivable from an
agency's accounts receivable records but does not necessarily eliminate
further collection efforts.
